Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.84 RCW to read as follows:(1) No person may publicly protest another person collecting signatures for or signing any initiative or referendum petition within 25 feet of the person collecting signatures or the person signing or attempting to sign any initiative or referendum petition.(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a violation of RCW 29A.84.250(4).--- END ---